Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2906
Name.

(1) The name of a limited cooperative association must contain the words "limited cooperative association" or their abbreviation.

(2) The name of a limited cooperative association shall not be the same as or deceptively similar to:

(a) The name of any entity organized or authorized to transact business in this state;

(b) A name reserved or registered under section 21-2907 or 21-2908; and

(c) A fictitious name approved for a foreign limited cooperative association authorized to transact business in this state.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 6.